Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1909.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 191 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Youth
Advisory Council Act".

Req. No. 11183 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 192 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created the Oklahoma Youth Advisory Council to
serve as a dynamic platform for young people to examine, evaluate,
and discuss the issues, interests, and needs that impact Oklahoma
youth both now and in the future. The Council shall formally advise
and make actionable recommendations to elected officials on these
matters, ensuring that the voices of Oklahoma's youth are
meaningfully incorporated into public policy. The issues may
include, but need not be limited to, education, employment, and
economic opportunity, access to state and local government services,
the environment, behavioral and physical health, safe environments
for youth, substance abuse, poverty, and increased youth
participation in state and local government.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 193 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Council shall consist of fifty-three (53) members as
follows:
1. Forty-eight members representing each of the Oklahoma Senate
districts; and
2. Five at-large members representing the federally recognized
Indian tribal governments within the State of Oklahoma.
Req. No. 11183 Page 2

B. Members shall meet the following qualifications at the time
of appointment:
1. Be at least fourteen (14) years of age but not older than
nineteen (19) years of age; and
2. Be enrolled in their sophomore, junior, or senior year
attending an Oklahoma high school, including an online or charter
school, participating in a nonpublic, home-based educational
program, participating in a general equivalency degree program, or
have obtained a high school or general equivalency diploma.
C. 1. On or before November 1, 2025, each Senator elected to
represent a Senate District in the state may appoint one Council
member from his or her district.
2. The five at-large members representing the federally
recognized Indian tribal governments shall be selected to help
ensure diversity on the Council, with an express concern for
adequate Native American representation.
D. 1. On or before August 31, the Council members shall
approve subsequent appointments to the Council by a majority vote.
A youth who meets the criteria set forth in subsection B of this
section may apply to the Council to be considered for participation
in the Council.
2. The Council shall utilize an application process to
facilitate Council appointments, including the content and

Req. No. 11183 Page 3

avai lability of the application form, additional selection criteria,
and an application review process.
E. Every effort shall be made to create a Council that
represents the diversity of the youth of the state.
F. Legislative members of the Council shall be appointed as
follows:
1. Every legislative session, the Speaker and Minority Leader
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives shall each appoint one
member from the House of Representatives; and
2. Every legislative session, the President Pro-Tempore and
Minority Leader of the Oklahoma State Senate shall each appoint one
member from the Senate.
G. The Council may appoint members to serve in any leadership
roles described in its bylaws.
H. A vacancy on the Council shall be filled through a vote of
the members for the remainder of the unexpired term. Vacancies of
nonlegislative members on the Council shall be filled pursuant to
the application process described in subsection D of this section.
Vacancies of legislative members shall be filled by the appointing
authority. Vacancies of nonlegislative members on the Council who
are not designated as at-large members shall be filled by a youth
coming from the same Senate district as the departing nonlegislative
member.

Req. No. 11183 Page 4

SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 194 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Youth Advisory Council shall have the following
duties and responsibilities:
1. Adopt written bylaws setting forth a leadership structure
for the Council, which may be amended if necessary;
2. Work with any existing and appropriate local and state youth
groups to identify the concerns and needs of youth in Oklahoma;
3. Advise and make oral and written recommendations to members
of the Oklahoma Legislature on proposed or pending legislation;
4. Work with any existing and appropriate local and state youth
groups to collect, analyze, and provide information on issues
related to youth to the legislative committees, commissions, task
forces, and state agencies and departments as appropriate;
5. Consult with any existing local-level youth advisory
Councils for input and potential solutions on issues related to
youth; and
6. Set priorities and establish any committees that may be
necessary to achieve the goals of the Council.
B. 1. At the first meeting, the Council shall determine the
location and time of future meetings, as well as any other
procedural issues it deems necessary.

Req. No. 11183 Page 5

2. The Council shall meet at least four times each year, with
two meetings occurring during the regular legislative session and
two meetings occurring after the regular legislative session has
concluded. Council members may attend and participate in Council
meetings remotely, but at least two of the Council's meetings each
year shall be held in person with all attending members at the same
physical location. Additional meetings may be held at the
discretion of Council leadership, subject to available funds.
3. All meetings of the Council shall be open to the public.
4. The Council has the authority to develop rules and
procedures to govern its activities.
C. The Council shall utilize news outlets and publications,
public awareness campaigns, and a website to develop and maintain
regular communication concerning its activities with the youth of
Oklahoma, the State of Oklahoma, and interested parties.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 195 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Council shall report to the Review Committee during each
interim that the Review Committee meets.
B. The reports shall include, but shall not be limited to:
1. A summary of the Council's recommendations concerning key
issues for youth including any proposals for legislation the Council
would like the Review Committee to consider; and
Req. No. 11183 Page 6

2. A summary of the Council's work during the prior year.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 196 of Title 10, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Youth Advisory Council Review Committee is
hereby created to review the work of the Oklahoma Youth Advisory
Council and to recommend legislation affecting Oklahoma youth.
B. The Review Committee shall be comprised of the legislative
members of the Council, five nonlegislative Council members who are
appointed by the Council, and one legislative member appointed by
the legislative members of the Council.
1. The five legislative members of the Review Committee shall
serve as voting members. All other members are nonvoting members.
2. In odd-numbered years, the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives shall appoint the chair of the Review Committee and
the President Pro-Tempore of the Oklahoma State Senate shall appoint
the vice-chair. In even-numbered years, the President Pro-Tempore
of the Oklahoma State Senate shall appoint the chair and the Speaker
of the Oklahoma House of Representatives shall appoint the vice-
chair.
C. The Review Committee may meet up to three times each interim
and recommend up to six bills to the legislative Council based on
the Council's recommendations and findings.

Req. No. 11183 Page 7

D. Meetings shall be held at the Oklahoma State Capitol or
virtually, as determined by the Review Committee.
E. The Review Committee shall evaluate the Council’s annual
report and other work products.
F. All meetings of the Review Committee shall be open to the
public.
SECTION 7. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11183 CMA 01/15/25















Req. No. 11183 Page 8